Wyoming, session 2025, HB0126.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-16-103(a)(ii) and (b)(i) is
amended to read:

39-16-103. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:

HB0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0462
(ii) Specified digital products sold, services
to repair, alter or improve tangible personal property sold
and tangible personal property sold by any person for
delivery in this state or where first use of the service
occurs in this state is deemed sold for storage, use or
consumption herein and is subject to the tax imposed by
this article unless the person selling the property has
received from the purchaser a signed certificate stating
the property or service was purchased for resale and
showing his name and address. Specified digital products
are only subject to the tax imposed by this article as
specified in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(i) Specified digital products sold, services to
repair, alter or improve tangible personal property sold
and tangible personal property sold by any person for
delivery in this state or where first use of the service
occurs in this state is deemed sold for storage, use or
consumption herein and is subject to the tax imposed by
this article unless the person selling the property has
received from the purchaser a signed certificate stating
HB0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0462
the property or service was purchased for resale and
showing his name and address. Specified digital products
are only subject to the tax imposed by this article as
specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section;

Section 2. W.S. 39-15-103(a)(i)(J) is repealed.

Section 3. The department of revenue shall adopt any
rules necessary to implement the repeal of the sales and
use tax on services performed for the repair, alteration or
improvement of tangible personal property not later than
July 1, 2025.

HB0126

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0462
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective July
1, 2025.

(END)
HB0126